Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Article 2. Agricultural and Fisheries Products Preference.

Sec. 36.15.050.
Use of local agricultural and fisheries products required in purchases with state money.

When agricultural products are purchased by the state or by a school district that receives state money, a preference not less than seven percent nor more than 15 percent shall be applied to the price of products harvested in the state.

When fisheries products are purchased by the state or by a school district that receives state money, a preference not less than seven percent nor more than 15 percent shall be applied to the price of products harvested or processed within the jurisdiction of the state.

A solicitation for the purchase of agricultural or fisheries products must include written notice of the preferences under (a) and (b) of this section and specify that agricultural products harvested in the state and fisheries products harvested or processed within the jurisdiction of the state will be used where possible. If the state or a school district that receives state money purchases agricultural products harvested outside the state or fisheries products harvested or processed outside the jurisdiction of the state, the officer responsible for the purchase shall certify in writing the reasons that agricultural products harvested in the state or fisheries products harvested or processed within the jurisdiction of the state were not purchased.

If a contractor fails to comply with this section, the purchasing agency shall withhold payment until the contractor complies. If a school district fails to comply with this section, the department responsible for disbursing state money to the school district shall withhold the money until the school district complies.

An interested party, as defined in AS

36.30.699

, may seek administrative or judicial review of the award of a contract in violation of this section.

Compliance with this section is not required if an exception to this section is mandated for participation in a federal program.

A bidder receiving a preference under this section may not receive a preference under AS

36.30.322

.

In this section,

“agricultural products” includes dairy products, timber and lumber, and products manufactured in the state from timber and lumber;

“school district” includes a regional educational attendance area established under AS 14.08;

“state money” includes state reimbursement to school districts for school or related construction, foundation funding for education, municipal assistance, community assistance, revenue sharing, and state funds for capital projects.

History.

(§ 1 ch 16 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 62 SLA 1987; am §§ 3 — 7 ch 64 SLA 1988; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 59 SLA 2013; am § 15 ch 44 SLA 2016; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 103 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 36.16.020. Renumbered in 1986.

Subsections (c) — (f) were enacted as (d) — (g) and relettered in 1987.

Subsection (g) was enacted as (h) and relettered in 2013.

Subsection (h) was relettered in 1987 and 2013.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska product preference, see 3 AAC 92.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (h)(3), inserted “community assistance” following “municipal assistance”.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “a preference not less than seven percent nor more than 15 percent” preceding “shall be applied”, and made a stylistic change; in (b), substituted “a preference not less than seven percent nor more than 15 percent” preceding “shall be applied”, and made a stylistic change; rewrote (c).

Opinions of attorney general. —

It is not exactly clear how the current United States Supreme Court will treat state home-state purchasing preference laws when “downstream” effects, interfering with natural market forces, are substantial, so state and municipal corporation administrators using state money to finance public projects should be cautious about reaching too far into the market place beyond those directly supplying to and contracting with public agencies, and should be especially cautious when foreign commerce is involved.
Apr. 18, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

This section does not apply to a school district’s purchase of agricultural products for its school lunch program where the money involved is not “state money” within the meaning of the statute, such as where the source is federal subsidies and student payments.
Jan. 20, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 36.15.060.
Insertion of clause in calls for bids and in contracts.

A clause containing the substance of the relevant subsection of AS

36.15.050

shall be inserted in all calls for bids and in all contracts awarded that involve agricultural or fisheries products.

History.

(§ 1 ch 16 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 36.16.020. Renumbered in 1986.